District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.51

Certified addiction counselor I.

(a)

The Board of Professional Counseling shall certify as an addiction counselor I a person who, in addition to meeting the requirements of subchapter V of this chapter [§ 3-1205 et seq.]:

(1)

(A)

Has met the educational requirements of graduating with at least an associate’s degree in health or human services from an accredited institution that incorporates the academic course work and minimum hours of supervised training required by the regulations adopted by the Board and whose program is accredited by an agency recognized by the U.S. Department of Education; or

(B)

Has at least 2 years of documented, supervised experience in the field of addiction counseling; and

(2)

Passed a national examination approved by the Board.

(b)

A certified addiction counselor I shall practice addiction counseling under the supervision of an authorized health-care professional.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 851
as added July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-13, § 2(e), 56 DCR 3608
This section is referenced in § 3-1208.54.